District of Columbia statutes.
47-1445

Repealed

License expiration, fees and renewals; change in location of principal place of business.

Repealed.

July 13, 1978, D.C. Law 2-91, § 405, 24 DCR 9765
Apr. 30, 1988, D.C. Law 7-104, § 35(c), (d), 35 DCR 147
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1243(a), 46 DCR 3142
1981 Ed., § 47-1445.
1973 Ed., § 47-3320.